New Jersey, session 222, S692.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.1983, c.392 (C.13:1E-127) is amended to read as follows: 2.    As used in the provisions of P.L.1983, c.392 (C.13:1E-126 et seq.) and P.L.1991, c.269 (C.13:1E-128.1 et al.): a.     Applicant means any business concern that (1) has filed a disclosure statement with the Attorney General and is seeking a license, provided that the business concern has furnished the department and the Attorney General with any information required pursuant to P.L.1983, c.392 (C.13:1E-126 et seq.), or (2) has been issued a soil and fill recycling registration pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2019, c.397 (C.13:1E-127.1), has filed a disclosure statement with the Attorney General, and is seeking a soil and fill recycling license. b.    Application means the forms and accompanying documents filed in connection with an applicants or permittees request for a license or a soil and fill recycling license. c.     Business concern means any corporation, association, firm, partnership, sole proprietorship, trust, limited liability company, or other form of commercial organization. d.    Department means the Department of Environmental Protection. e.     Disclosure statement means a statement submitted to the Attorney General by an applicant or a permittee, which statement shall include: (1)   The full name, business address, telephone number, email address, and social security number of the applicant or the permittee, as the case may be, and of any officers, directors, partners, or key employees thereof and all persons holding any equity in or debt liability of the applicant or permittee, or, if the applicant or permittee is a publicly traded corporation, all persons holding more than five percent of the equity in or the debt liability of the applicant or permittee, except that (a) where the equity in or debt liability of the applicant or permittee is held by an institutional investor, the applicant or permittee need only supply the name, business address and the basis upon which the institutional investor qualifies as an institutional investor, and (b) where the debt liability is held by a chartered lending institution, the applicant or permittee need only supply the name and business address of the lending institution; (2)   The full name, business address, telephone number, email address, and social security number of all officers, directors, or partners of any business concern disclosed in the disclosure statement and the names and addresses of all persons holding any equity in or the debt liability of any business concern so disclosed, except that (a) where the business concern is a publicly traded corporation, the applicant or permittee need only supply the name and business address of the publicly traded corporation and copies of its annual filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, or its foreign equivalent, (b) where the equity in or debt liability of that business concern is held by an institutional investor, the applicant or permittee need only supply the name, business address and the basis upon which the institutional investor qualifies as an institutional investor, and (c) where the debt liability is held by a chartered lending institution, the applicant or permittee need only supply the name and business address of the lending institution; (3)   The full name and business address of any business concern which collects, transports, treats, stores, brokers, transfers or disposes of solid waste or hazardous waste, or that engages in soil and fill recycling services, in which the applicant or the permittee holds an equity interest; (4)   A description of the experience and credentials in, including any past or present licenses for, the collection, transportation, treatment, storage, brokering, transfer or disposal of solid waste or hazardous waste, or the provision of soil and fill recycling services, possessed by the applicant or the permittee, as the case may be, and by the key employees, officers, directors, or partners thereof; (5)   A listing and explanation of any notices of violation or prosecution, administrative orders or license revocations issued by this State or any other state or federal authority, in the 10 years immediately preceding the filing of the application or disclosure statement, whichever is later, which are pending or have resulted in a finding or a settlement of a violation of any law or rule and regulation relating to the collection, transportation, treatment, storage, brokering, transfer or disposal of solid waste or hazardous waste, or the provision of soil and fill recycling services, by the applicant or the permittee, as the case may be, or by any key employee, officer, director, or partner thereof; (6)   A listing and explanation of any judgment of liability or conviction which was rendered, pursuant to the laws of this State, or any other state or federal statute or local ordinance, against the applicant or the permittee, as the case may be, or against any key employee, officer, director, or partner thereof, except for any violation of Title 39 of the Revised Statutes other than a violation of the provisions of P.L.1983, c.102 (C.39:5B-18 et seq.), P.L.1983, c.401 (C.39:5B-25 et seq.) or P.L.1985, c.415 (C.39:5B-30 et seq.); (7)   A listing of all labor unions and trade and business associations in which the applicant or the permittee was a member or with which the applicant or the permittee had a collective bargaining agreement during the 10 years preceding the date of the filing of the application or disclosure statement, whichever is later; (8)   A listing of any agencies outside of New Jersey which had regulatory responsibility over the applicant or the permittee, as the case may be, in connection with the collection, transportation, treatment, storage, brokering, transfer or disposal of solid waste or hazardous waste or in connection with the provision of soil and fill recycling services; (9)   The full name and business address of any individual or business concern that leases real property or equipment used for the collection, transportation, treatment, processing, storage, brokering, transfer, or disposal of solid waste or hazardous waste, or the provision of soil and fill recycling services, to the applicant, permittee, or licensee; (10) A listing and explanation of any civil litigation pending between the applicant, permittee, licensee, key employee, officer, director, or partner thereof and any other person engaged in the collection, transportation, treatment, processing, storage, brokering, transfer, or disposal of solid waste or hazardous waste or in the provision of soil and fill recycling services, related to the provision of solid waste, hazardous waste or soil and fill recycling services; and (11) Any other information the Attorney General may require that relates to the competency, reliability or integrity of the applicant or the permittee. The provisions of paragraphs (1) through (11) of this subsection to the contrary notwithstanding, if an applicant or a permittee is a secondary business activity corporation, disclosure statement means a statement submitted to the Attorney General by an applicant or a permittee, which statement shall include: (a)   The full name, primary business activity, office or position held, business address, home address, telephone number, email address, date of birth and federal employer identification number of the applicant or the permittee, as the case may be, and of all officers, directors, partners, or key employees of the business concern; and of all persons holding more than five percent of the equity in or debt liability of that business concern, except that where the debt liability is held by a chartered lending institution, the applicant or permittee need only supply the name and business address of the lending institution.  The Attorney General or the department may request the social security number of any individual identified pursuant to this paragraph; (b)   The full name, business address and federal employer identification number of any business concern in any state, territory or district of the United States, which (i) engages in soil and fill recycling services, or (ii) collects, transports, treats, stores, processes, recycles, brokers, transfers or disposes of solid waste or hazardous waste on a commercial basis, in which the applicant or the permittee holds an equity interest, and the type, amount and dates of the equity held in such business concern; (c)   A listing of every license, registration, permit, certificate of public convenience and necessity, uniform tariff approval or equivalent operating authorization held by the applicant or permittee within the last five years under any name for the collection, transportation, treatment, storage, brokering, recycling, processing, transfer or disposal of solid waste or hazardous waste, or the provision of soil and fill recycling services, on a commercial basis in any state, territory or district of the United States, and the name of every agency issuing such operating authorization; (d)   If the applicant or the permittee is a subsidiary of a parent corporation, or is the parent corporation of one or more subsidiaries, or is part of a group of companies in common ownership, as the case may be, a chart, or, if impractical or burdensome, a list showing the names, federal employer identification numbers and relationships of all parent, sister, subsidiary and affiliate corporations, or members of the group, and the equity interest by percentage for each subsidiary company; (e)   A listing and explanation of any notices of violation or prosecution, administrative orders or license revocations issued by this State or any other state or federal authority to the applicant or permittee in the 10 years immediately preceding the filing of the application or disclosure statement, whichever is later, which are pending or have resulted in a finding or a settlement of a violation of any law or rule or regulation relating to the collection, transportation, treatment, storage, brokering, recycling, processing, transfer or disposal of solid waste or hazardous waste, or the provision of soil and fill recycling services, by the applicant or permittee; (f)   A listing and explanation of any judgment, decree or order, whether by consent or not, issued against the applicant or permittee in the 10 years immediately preceding the filing of the application, and of any pending civil complaints against the applicant or permittee pertaining to a violation or alleged violation of federal or state antitrust laws, trade regulations or securities regulations; (g)   A listing and explanation of any conviction issued against the applicant or permittee for a felony resulting in a plea of nolo contendere, or any conviction in the 10 years immediately preceding the filing of the application, and of any pending indictment, accusation, complaint or information for any felony issued to the applicant or the permittee pursuant to any state or federal statute; and (h)   A completed personal history disclosure form shall be submitted to the Attorney General by every person required to be listed in this disclosure statement, except for those individuals who are exempt from the personal history disclosure requirements pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection a. of section 3 of P.L.1983, c.392 (C.13:1E-128). f.     Key employee means any individual employed or otherwise engaged by the applicant, the permittee or the licensee in a supervisory capacity or empowered to make discretionary decisions with respect to the solid waste, hazardous waste, or soil and fill recycling operations of the business concern; any family member of an officer, director, partner, or key employee, which family member is employed or otherwise engaged by the applicant or permittee; [or any broker, consultant or sales person employed or otherwise engaged by, or who do business with, the applicant, permittee, or licensee, with respect to the solid waste, hazardous waste, or soil and fill recycling operations of the business concern;] but shall not include (1) employees, who are not family members, exclusively engaged in the physical or mechanical collection, transportation, treatment, storage, transfer or disposal of solid waste or hazardous waste, or the provision of soil and fill recycling services; or (2) a sales person employed by a publicly traded corporation or a direct or indirect subsidiary of a publicly traded corporation. g.    License means the approval of any registration statement or engineering design pursuant to P.L.1970, c.39 (C.13:1E-1 et seq.) or P.L.1981, c.279 (C.13:1E-49 et seq.), for the collection, transportation, treatment, storage, processing, brokering, transfer or disposal of solid waste or hazardous waste in this State. A license shall not include any registration statement or engineering design approved for: (1)   Any State department, division, agency, commission or authority, or county, municipality or agency thereof; (2)   Any person solely for the collection, transportation, treatment, storage, processing, brokering, transfer, or disposal of solid waste or hazardous waste generated by that person, provided that the department may adopt regulations to limit the scope of this exemption based on volume or other standards; (3)   Any person for the operation of a hazardous waste facility, if at least 75 percent of the total design capacity of that facility is utilized to treat, store or dispose of hazardous waste generated by that person; (4)   Any person for the operation of a hazardous waste facility which is considered as such solely as the result of the reclamation, recycling or refining of hazardous wastes which are or contain any of the following precious metals: gold, silver, osmium, platinum, palladium, iridium, rhodium, ruthenium, or copper; (5)   Any person solely for the transportation of hazardous wastes which are or contain precious metals to a hazardous waste facility described in paragraph (4) of this subsection for the purposes of reclamation. A license shall include any registration statement approved for any person who transports any other hazardous waste in addition to hazardous wastes which are or contain precious metals; (6)   Any person solely for the collection, transportation, treatment, storage or disposal of granular activated carbon used in the adsorption of hazardous waste; or (7)   Any regulated medical waste generator for the treatment or disposal of regulated medical waste at any noncommercial incinerator or noncommercial facility in this State that accepts regulated medical waste for disposal. h.    Licensee means any business concern which has completed the requirements of section 3 of P.L.1983, c.392 (C.13:1E-128) and whose application for the issuance or renewal of a license has been approved by the department pursuant to section 8 of P.L.1983, c.392 (C.13:1E-133). i.     Permittee means and shall include: (1)   Any business concern which has filed a disclosure statement with the department and the Attorney General and to which a valid registration statement or engineering design approval for the collection, transportation, treatment, storage, transfer or disposal of solid waste or hazardous waste pursuant to P.L.1970, c.39 (C.13:1E-1 et seq.) or P.L.1981, c.279 (C.13:1E-49 et seq.) has been given by the department prior to June 14, 1984; (2)   Any business concern which has filed a disclosure statement with the department and the Attorney General and to which a temporary license has been approved, issued or renewed by the department pursuant to section 10 of P.L.1983, c.392 (C.13:1E-135), but which has not otherwise completed the requirements of section 3 of P.L.1983, c.392 (C.13:1E-128) and whose application for a license has not been approved by the department pursuant to section 8 of P.L.1983, c.392 (C.13:1E-133), provided that the temporary license remains valid, and provided further that the business concern has furnished the department and the Attorney General with any information required pursuant to P.L.1991, c.269 (C.13:1E-128.1 et al.); (3)   Any business concern which has filed a disclosure statement with the department and the Attorney General and to which a valid registration statement or engineering design approval for the collection, transportation, treatment, storage, transfer or disposal of solid waste or hazardous waste pursuant to P.L.1970, c.39 (C.13:1E-1 et seq.) or P.L.1981, c.279 (C.13:1E-49 et seq.) has been given by the department between February 20, 1985 and January 23, 1986, inclusive, provided that the registration statement or engineering design approval remains valid, and provided further that the business concern has furnished the department and the Attorney General with any information required pursuant to P.L.1991, c.269 (C.13:1E-128.1 et al.); or (4)   Any business concern to which a temporary approval of registration has been given by the department at any time after January 23, 1986 pursuant to statute or rule and regulation, provided that such temporary approval of registration, statute, or rule and regulation remains valid, and provided further that the business concern has furnished the department and the Attorney General with any information required pursuant to P.L.1991, c.269 (C.13:1E-128.1 et al.) and filed a disclosure statement with the department and the Attorney General. j.     Person means any individual or business concern. k.    Secondary business activity corporation means any business concern which has derived less than five percent of its annual gross revenues in each of the three years immediately preceding the one in which the application for a license or a soil and fill recycling license is being made from the collection, transportation, treatment, storage, processing, brokering, transfer or disposal of solid waste or hazardous waste, or the provision of soil and fill recycling services, whether directly or through other business concerns partially or wholly owned or controlled by the applicant or the permittee, as the case may be, and which (1) has one or more classes of security registered pursuant to section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (15 U.S.C. s.78l), or (2) is an issuer subject to subsection (d) of section 15 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (15 U.S.C. s.78o). l.     Institutional investor means a retirement fund administered by a public agency for the exclusive benefit of federal, state, or local public employees; government or government-owned entity; investment company registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. s.80a-1 et seq.); collective investment trust organized by banks under Part Nine of the Rules of the Comptroller of the Currency; closed end investment trust; chartered or licensed life insurance company or property and casualty insurance company; banking or other chartered or licensed lending institution; partnerships, funds or trusts managed by or directed in conjunction with an investment adviser registered under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. s.80b-1 et seq.) or an institutional investment manager required to make filings under subsection (f) of section 13 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (15 U.S.C. s.78m); institutional buyer, as defined pursuant to section 2 of the Uniform Securities Law (1997), P.L.1967, c.93 (C.49:3-49); small business investment company licensed by the United States Small Business Administration under subsection (c) of section 301 of the Small Business Investment Act of 1958, as amended (15 U.S.C. s.681); private equity or venture capital entity having or managing aggregate capital commitments in excess of $25,000,000; and other persons as the Attorney General may determine for reasons consistent with the policies of P.L.1983, c.392 (C.13:1E-126 et seq.). m.   Publicly traded corporation means a corporation or other legal entity, except a natural person, which: (1)   has one or more classes of security registered pursuant to section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (15 U.S.C. s.78l); (2)   is an issuer subject to subsection (d) of section 15 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (15 U.S.C. s.78o); or (3)   has one or more classes of securities traded in an open market in any foreign jurisdiction, provided that the Attorney General determines that the foreign exchange provides openness, integrity and oversight in its operations sufficient to meet the intent of P.L.1983, c.392 (C.13:1E-126 et seq.), or that the securities traded on the foreign exchange are regulated pursuant to a statute of a foreign jurisdiction that is substantially similar, both in form and effect, to section 12 or subsection (d) of section 15 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. n.    Broker means a person who for direct or indirect compensation arranges agreements between a business concern and its customers for the collection, transportation, treatment, storage, processing, transfer or disposal of solid waste or hazardous waste, or the provision of soil and fill recycling services.  Broker does not include a person who, on the persons own behalf, retains the services of a licensed business concern to provide for the collection, transportation, treatment, storage, processing, transfer, or disposal of solid waste or hazardous waste, or the provision of soil and fill recycling services, at a property owned by, or under the control of, the person. o.    Consultant means a person who performs functions for a business concern engaged in the collection, transportation, treatment, storage, processing, brokering, transfer or disposal of solid waste or hazardous waste, or the provision of soil and fill recycling services, provided that consultant shall not include a person who performs functions for a business concern and holds a professional license from the State in order to perform those functions. p.    Family member means spouse, domestic partner, partner in a civil union, child, parent, sibling, aunt, uncle, niece, nephew, first cousin, grandparent, grandchild, father-in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, stepparent, stepchild, stepbrother, stepsister, half brother, or half sister, whether the individual is related by blood, marriage, or adoption. q.    Soil and fill recyclable materials means non-putrescible aggregate substitute, including, but not limited to, broken or crushed brick, block, concrete, or other similar manufactured materials; soil or soil that may contain aggregate substitute or other debris or material, generated from land clearing, excavation, demolition, or redevelopment activities that would otherwise be managed as solid waste, and that may be returned to the economic mainstream in the form of raw materials for further processing or for use as fill material.  Soil and fill recyclable materials shall not include:  (1) Class A recyclable material, as defined by regulation adopted pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1989, c.268 (C.13:1E-99.43); (2) Class B recyclable material, as defined by regulation adopted pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1989, c.268 (C.13:1E-99.43), that is shipped to a Class B recycling center approved by the department for receipt, storage, processing, or transfer in accordance with subsection b. of section 41 of P.L.1987, c.102 (C.13:1E-99.34); (3) beneficial use material for which the generator has obtained prior approval from the department to transport to an approved and designated destination pursuant to regulations adopted pursuant to subsection a. of section 6 of P.L.1970, c.39 (C.13:1E-6); [and] (4) virgin quarry products including, but not limited to, rock, stone, gravel, sand, clay and other mined products; and (5) alternative fill, as defined in N.J.A.C. 7:26E-1.8, that is approved for use at a site under the direction and oversight of a licensed site remediation professional. r.     Sales person means a person or persons that makes or arranges for sales for a business concern, for the collection, transportation, treatment, storage, processing, transfer or disposal of solid waste or hazardous waste or the provision of soil and fill recycling services. s.     Soil and fill recycling license means an approval to operate a business concern engaged in soil and fill recycling services issued pursuant to section 8 of P.L.1983, c.392 (C.13:1E-133). t.     Soil and fill recycling services means the services provided by persons engaging in the business of the collection, transportation, processing, brokering, storage, purchase, sale or disposition, or any combination thereof, of soil and fill recyclable materials. Soil and fill recycling services shall not include: (1) the operation of a solar electric power generation facility at a properly closed sanitary landfill where soil and fill materials have been previously deposited for permanent disposal; (2) the intra-utility transportation or processing of soil and fill recyclable materials; (3) remediation activities involving soil and fill recyclable materials at sites where a licensed site remediation professional has been hired pursuant to N.J.A.C.7:26C-1.1 et seq.; (4) the transportation to or from, or the storage at, a single site of less than 200 cubic yards of soil and fill recyclable materials per day; or (5) the generation of soil by an entity governed by the Board of Public Utilities and its contractors, as well as contractors performing work on a public works project for any State transportation agency or any entity governed by the Local Public Contracts Law, P.L.1971, c.198 (C.40A:11-1 et seq.), provided that the removal, transportation, and disposal of the soil is in accordance with the projects plans and specifications. u.  Extension of a utility facility means property that a public utility does not own but in which a public utility has an easement, franchise rights, or other legal rights to install, maintain, repair, and operate its utility services, including, but not limited to, electric transmission and distribution lines, water pipes, and gas pipeline rights of way. v.  Intra-utility transportation or processing means the transportation or processing of soil and fill recyclable materials where: (1) a public utility, or a utility contractor, generates the soil and fill recyclable materials at a utility facility or an extension of a utility facility; (2) the soil and fill recyclable materials are transported by a public utility or utility contractor to a utility facility that accepts soil, fill, and solid waste managed by the public utility or its utility contractor for temporary storage, characterization, and other management prior to final disposal or recycling; (3) the processing of soil and fill recyclable materials at the accepting utility facility is limited to the removal of residual recyclables such as concrete, asphalt, and wood from soil, and the solidification of wet soils using moisture absorbing additives where required for transportation; (4) the final disposal or recycling of the soil and fill recyclable materials is undertaken in accordance with the provisions of the Solid Waste Management Act, P.L.1970, c.39 (C.13:1E-1 et seq.), the New Jersey Statewide Mandatory Source Separation and Recycling Act, P.L.1987, c.102 (C.13:1E-99.11 et al.), P.L.1983, c.392 (C.13:1E-126 et seq.), and any other applicable State solid waste law; and (5) any soil and fill recyclable materials that meet the classification requirements of hazardous waste are managed as hazardous waste in accordance with the provisions of any applicable State or federal laws. w.  Licensed site remediation professional means the same as the term is defined in section 23 of P.L.1993, c.139 (C.58:10B-1). x.  Public utility means an entity that is covered under the provisions of R.S.48:2-13, and that is regulated by the Board of Public Utilities pursuant to R.S.48:1-1 et seq., except that public utility shall not include a solid waste collection utility or a solid waste disposal utility. y.  Utility contractor means an entity that is under agreement, contract, or other engagement with a public utility to undertake utility-related construction, excavation, maintenance, repair, transport, or other work, provided that the entity is under the direction, supervision, or oversight of the public utility. z.  Utility facility means property owned, leased, operated, or otherwise under the control of a public utility. (cf:  P.L.2019, c.397, s.3) 2.    Section 1 of P.L.2019, c.397 (C.13:1E-127.1) is amended to read as follows: 1. a. No later than July 14, 2022, any business concern that is not already a licensee pursuant to P.L.1983, c.392 (C.13:1E-126 et seq.), and that actively engages in, or otherwise provides, soil and fill recycling services shall register with the department. The registration shall include, but need not be limited to: (1) the name of the business concern and its New Jersey corporate filing number; (2) the address of the business concern and the addresses of any other locations where trucks or equipment used by the business concern are kept; (3) contact information for the business concern, including, but not limited to, a valid phone number and email address; and (4) a statement by the business concern that it is actively engaged in soil and fill recycling services at the time of registration. b.    A business concern shall submit the information required pursuant to subsection a. of this section on a registration form prescribed by the department.  The business concern shall certify to the truth and accuracy of the information provided in the registration form. c.     No more than 90 days after submission of a registration form pursuant to this section, the department shall issue a soil and fill recycling registration to the business concern.  Issuance of a soil and fill recycling registration pursuant to this section shall not preclude the department or the Attorney General from subsequently denying a soil and fill recycling license to the registrant. d.    No more than [30] 45 days after the department adopts, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations implementing P.L.2019, c.397 (C.13:1E-127.1 et al.), a registrant shall submit a valid and administratively complete application for a soil and fill recycling license with the Attorney General.  Registrants may request a 90-day extension to file a soil and fill recycling license application pursuant to this section, and the Attorney General may grant the request upon a showing of good cause. e.     A soil and fill recycling registration issued pursuant to this section shall automatically expire and become invalid upon: (1) failure by the registrant to submit a valid and administratively complete application for a soil and fill recycling license within the required timeframe; or (2) a final determination by the department or the Attorney General regarding the registrant's application for a soil and fill recycling license. f.     A soil and fill recycling registration issued pursuant to this section is non-transferable and shall temporarily authorize the registrant to provide soil and fill recycling services pending the approval or denial of the registrant's application for a soil and fill recycling license. g.    Any business concern that seeks to engage in soil and fill recycling services after July 14, 2022 that has not submitted a registration form pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall file an application for a soil and fill recycling license with the Attorney General. h.    As used in this section, "registrant" means any person who applies for and is issued a soil and fill recycling registration pursuant to this section. (cf:  P.L.2022, c.64, s.1) 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.